New York, session 2025-2026, S7858.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2852 of the public authorities law is REPEALED. 2 § 2. Subdivision 6 of section 354 of the public authorities law, as 3 amended by section 2 of part TT of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 6. To appoint officers, agents and employees and fix their compen- 6 sation, provided, however, that the appointment of the executive direc- 7 tor shall be subject to confirmation by the senate [in accordance with 8 section twenty-eight hundred fifty-two of this chapter]; subject however 9 to the provisions of the civil service law, which shall apply to the 10 authority as a municipal corporation other than a city; 11 § 3. Section 1004 of the public authorities law, as amended by chapter 12 506 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as follows: 13 § 1004. Officers and employees; expenses. The trustees shall choose 14 from among their own number a [chairman and vice-chairman] chair and 15 vice-chair. They shall select such officers and employees, including a 16 chief executive officer whose appointment shall be subject to confirma- 17 tion by the senate [in accordance with section twenty-eight hundred 18 fifty-two of this chapter], and such engineering, marketing and legal 19 officers and employees, as they may require for the performance of their 20 duties and shall prescribe the duties and compensation of each officer 21 and employee. They shall adopt by-laws and rules and regulations suit- 22 able to the purposes of this title. As long as and to the extent that EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00512-01-5 S. 7858 2 1 the authority is dependent upon appropriations for the payment of its 2 expenses, it shall incur no obligations for salary, office or other 3 expenses prior to the making of appropriations adequate to meet the 4 same. 5 § 4. Subdivision 5 of section 1678 of the public authorities law, as 6 amended by chapter 506 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 5. To appoint officers, agents and employees and fix their compen- 9 sation, provided, however, that the appointment of the executive direc- 10 tor shall be subject to confirmation by the senate [in accordance with 11 section twenty-eight hundred fifty-two of this chapter]; 12 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.